Florida, session 2026, SB1508.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 41 42 Section 1.âThis act may be cited as âThe Motherhood 43 Initiative.â 44 Section 2.âSection 383.012, Florida Statutes, is created to 45 read: 46 383.012âHome visit program for expectant mothers.â 47 (1)âThe Department of Health shall expand the current home 48 visit program to include a home visit program for expectant 49 mothers within the Healthy Start program, which shall include 50 Healthy Start Care Coordination Programs. 51 (2)âThe program shall: 52 (a)1.âConduct screenings for expectant mothers for 53 depression and substance abuse disorders provided by a 54 registered nurse or licensed practical nurse licensed under part 55 I of chapter 464. 56 2.âRefer at-risk expectant mothers for mental health 57 treatment. 58 (b)âEnsure that an expectant mother is monitoring her blood 59 pressure and that the educational materials created under s. 60 383.55(3) are provided and reviewed with her. 61 (c)âInclude a 3-hour course on the care of a newborn 62 including, but not limited to, bathing, dressing, and feeding; 63 cardiopulmonary resuscitation; and setting up sleep routines for 64 the newborn and the mother which hospitals and birth centers 65 shall offer to a mother before going home with her newborn. 66 (3)âHealth insurance providers and Medicaid shall provide 67 coverage for the program, as applicable. 68 Section 3.âSubsection (1) of section 383.305, Florida 69 Statutes, is amended to read: 70 383.305âLicensure; fees.â 71 (1)âIn accordance with s. 408.805, an applicant or a 72 licensee shall pay a fee for each license application submitted 73 under ss. 383.30-383.332 and part II of chapter 408. The amount 74 of the fee shall be established by rule. The Agency for Health 75 Care Administration may reduce the fees for an applicant or a 76 licensee under this section for birthing centers in rural and 77 other medically underserved areas. 78 Section 4.âSection 383.31, Florida Statutes, is amended to 79 read: 80 383.31âSelection of clients; Informed consent.â 81 (1)(a)âA birth center may accept only those patients who 82 are expected to have normal pregnancies, labors, and deliveries. 83 (b)âThe criteria for the selection of birth center clients 84 and the establishment of risk status shall be defined by rule of 85 the agency. 86 (2)(a)âA patient may not be accepted for care at a birth 87 center until the patient has signed a client informed-consent 88 form. 89 (b)âThe agency shall develop a client informed-consent form 90 to be used by the center to inform the client of the benefits 91 and risks related to childbirth outside a hospital. 92 Section 5.âSection 383.55, Florida Statutes, is created to 93 read: 94 383.55âCoverage of blood pressure monitors and cuffs.â 95 (1)âAs used in this section, the term âblood pressure 96 monitor and cuffâ means a device designed for the purpose of 97 aiding in the treatment of hypertension by measuring blood 98 pressure levels through a validated blood pressure measurement 99 device at home or elsewhere outside of the clinic setting. 100 (2)âThe Department of Health shall provide a blood pressure 101 monitor and cuff for an expectant mother to monitor for 102 preeclampsia and shall provide all necessary repairs or 103 replacement parts for the blood pressure monitor and cuff. 104 (3)âThe department shall create educational materials on 105 the use of the blood pressure monitor and cuff, including, but 106 not limited to, the proper use of the blood pressure monitor and 107 cuff and the urgent maternal warning signs and symptoms provided 108 by the Hear Her campaign established by the United States 109 Centers for Disease Control and Prevention. 110 Section 6.âSection 395.3043, Florida Statutes, is created 111 to read: 112 395.3043âDoula and midwife services.â 113 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 114 (a)ââDoulaâ means a nonmedical professional who provides 115 physical, emotional, and informational support to individuals 116 and families before, during, and after childbirth. 117 (b)ââMidwifeâ has the same definition as in s. 467.003. 118 (2)âA doula or midwife may be present with his or her 119 client during childbirth at a hospital. 120 Section 7.âSection 395.6071, Florida Statutes, is created 121 to read: 122 395.6071âDoula and midwife services.â 123 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 124 (a)ââDoulaâ means a nonmedical professional who provides 125 physical, emotional, and informational support to individuals 126 and families before, during, and after childbirth. 127 (b)ââMidwifeâ has the same definition as in s. 467.003. 128 (2)âA doula or midwife may be present with his or her 129 client during childbirth at a rural hospital. 130 Section 8.âSection 402.822, Florida Statutes, is created to 131 read: 132 402.822âTwenty-four hour early learning centers.âThe 133 Department of Children and Families shall provide incentives for 134 early learning centers to remain open 24 hours for the children 135 of first responders, health care practitioners, and people 136 employed in other industries who work nontraditional hours. 137 Incentives for child care facilities may include, but need not 138 be limited to: 139 (1)âRaising subsidy rates for child care outside of 140 traditional hours. 141 (2)âAuthorizing local agencies to restructure their subsidy 142 systems. 143 (3)âAuthorizing counties to create contract nontraditional 144 hours slots for child care providers or to create shared service 145 agreements. 146 Section 9.âSection 458.355, Florida Statutes, is created to 147 read: 148 458.355âContinuing education; Medicaid payment 149 information.âThe continuing education requirements prescribed by 150 the board for a physician under this chapter or chapter 459 must 151 include education on the mandatory Medicaid payments for a 152 pregnant woman for the duration of her pregnancy and the 153 postpartum period, consisting of the 12-month period beginning 154 on the last day of her pregnancy. 155 Section 10.âSection 459.075, Florida Statutes, is created 156 to read: 157 459.075âContinuing education; Medicaid payment 158 information.âThe continuing education requirements prescribed by 159 the board for a physician under this chapter or chapter 458 must 160 include education on the mandatory Medicaid payments for a 161 pregnant woman for the duration of her pregnancy and the 162 postpartum period, consisting of the 12-month period beginning 163 on the last day of her pregnancy. 164 Section 11.âSubsection (15) of section 1002.83, Florida 165 Statutes, is amended to read: 166 1002.83âEarly learning coalitions.â 167 (15)(a)âEach school district shall, upon request of the 168 coalition, make a list of all individuals currently eligible to 169 act as a substitute teacher within the school district, pursuant 170 to rules adopted by the school district pursuant to s. 1012.35, 171 available to an early learning coalition serving students within 172 the school district. 173 (b)âChild care facilities as defined in s. 402.302 may 174 employ individuals listed as substitute instructors for the 175 purpose of offering the school readiness program, the Voluntary 176 Prekindergarten Education Program, and all other legally 177 operating child care programs. 178 1.âChild care facilities that receive support from early 179 learning coalitions shall be called early learning centers. 180 2.âThe Department of Education shall ensure appropriate 181 instruction and pacing of an approved curriculum for each early 182 learning center. 183 Section 12.âParagraph (a) of subsection (1) and subsection 184 (4) of section 1003.21, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 185 1003.21âSchool attendance.â 186 (1)(a)1.âAll children who have attained the age of 5 6 187 years or who will have attained the age of 5 6 years by February 188 1 of any school year or who are older than 5 6 years of age but 189 who have not attained the age of 16 years, except as otherwise 190 provided, are required to attend school regularly during the 191 entire school term. 192 2.âChildren who will have attained the age of 5 years on or 193 before September 1 of the school year are eligible for admission 194 to public kindergartens during that school year under rules 195 adopted by the district school board. 196 (4)âBefore admitting a child to kindergarten, the principal 197 shall require evidence that the child has attained the age at 198 which he or she should be admitted in accordance with the 199 provisions of paragraph (1)(a) subparagraph (1)(a)2. The 200 district school superintendent may require evidence of the age 201 of any child who is being enrolled in public school and who the 202 district school superintendent believes to be within the limits 203 of compulsory attendance as provided for by law; however, the 204 district school superintendent may not require evidence from any 205 child who meets regular attendance requirements by attending a 206 school or program listed in s. 1003.01(16)(b)-(e). If the first 207 prescribed evidence is not available, the next evidence 208 obtainable in the order set forth below shall be accepted: 209 (a)âA duly attested transcript of the childâs birth record 210 filed according to law with a public officer charged with the 211 duty of recording births; 212 (b)âA duly attested transcript of a certificate of baptism 213 showing the date of birth and place of baptism of the child, 214 accompanied by an affidavit sworn to by the parent; 215 (c)âAn insurance policy on the childâs life that has been 216 in force for at least 2 years; 217 (d)âA bona fide contemporary religious record of the 218 childâs birth accompanied by an affidavit sworn to by the 219 parent; 220 (e)âA passport or certificate of arrival in the United 221 States showing the age of the child; 222 (f)âA transcript of record of age shown in the childâs 223 school record of at least 4 years prior to application, stating 224 date of birth; or 225 (g)âIf none of these evidences can be produced, an 226 affidavit of age sworn to by the parent, accompanied by a 227 certificate of age signed by a public health officer or by a 228 public school physician, or, if these are not available in the 229 county, by a licensed practicing physician designated by the 230 district school board, which states that the health officer or 231 physician has examined the child and believes that the age as 232 stated in the affidavit is substantially correct. Children and 233 youths who are experiencing homelessness and children who are 234 known to the department, as defined in s. 39.0016, shall be 235 given temporary exemption from this section for 30 school days. 236 Section 13.âSubsection (2) of section 1002.53, Florida 237 Statutes, is amended to read: 238 1002.53âVoluntary Prekindergarten Education Program; 239 eligibility and enrollment.â 240 (2)âEach child who resides in this state who will have 241 attained the age of 4 years on or before September 1 of the 242 school year is eligible for the Voluntary Prekindergarten 243 Education Program during either that school year or the 244 following school year. The child remains eligible until the 245 child is admitted to kindergarten, or unless he or she will have 246 attained the age of 6 years by February 1 of any school year 247 under s. 1003.21(1)(a) s. 1003.21(1)(a)1. 248 Section 14.âSubsection (2) of section 1002.61, Florida 249 Statutes, is amended to read: 250 1002.61âSummer prekindergarten program delivered by public 251 schools and private prekindergarten providers.â 252 (2)âEach summer prekindergarten program delivered by a 253 public school or private prekindergarten provider must: 254 (a)âComprise at least 300 instructional hours; 255 (b)âNot begin earlier than May 1 of the school year; and 256 (c)âNot deliver the program for a child earlier than the 257 summer immediately before the school year for which the child is 258 eligible for admission to kindergarten in a public school under 259 s. 1003.21(1)(a) s. 1003.21(1)(a)2. 260 Section 15.âParagraph (c) of subsection (1) of section 261 1002.87, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 262 1002.87âSchool readiness program; eligibility and 263 enrollment.â 264 (1)âEach early learning coalition shall give priority for 265 participation in the school readiness program as follows: 266 (c)âSubsequent priority shall be given, based on the early 267 learning coalitionâs local priorities identified under s. 268 1002.85(2)(i), to children who meet the following criteria: 269 1.âA child from birth to the beginning of the school year 270 for which the child is eligible for admission to kindergarten in 271 a public school under s. 1003.21(1)(a) s. 1003.21(1)(a)2. who is 272 from a working family that is economically disadvantaged, and 273 may include such childâs eligible siblings, beginning with the 274 school year in which the sibling is eligible for admission to 275 kindergarten in a public school under s. 1003.21(1)(a) s. 276 1003.21(1)(a)2. until the beginning of the school year in which 277 the sibling is eligible to begin 6th grade, provided that the 278 first priority for funding an eligible sibling is local revenues 279 available to the coalition for funding direct services. 280 2.âA child of a parent who transitions from the work 281 program into employment as described in s. 445.032 from birth to 282 the beginning of the school year for which the child is eligible 283 for admission to kindergarten in a public school under s. 284 1003.21(1)(a) s. 1003.21(1)(a)2. 285 3.âAn at-risk child who is at least 9 years of age but 286 younger than 13 years of age. An at-risk child whose sibling is 287 enrolled in the school readiness program within an eligibility 288 priority category listed in paragraphs (a) and (b) and 289 subparagraph 1. shall be given priority over other children who 290 are eligible under this paragraph. 291 4.âA child who is younger than 13 years of age from a 292 working family that is economically disadvantaged. 293 5.âA child of a parent who transitions from the work 294 program into employment as described in s. 445.032 who is 295 younger than 13 years of age. 296 6.âA child who has special needs and has been determined 297 eligible as a student who requires additional accommodations 298 beyond those required by the Americans with Disabilities Act. 299 The childâs special needs and associated accommodations must be 300 validated by a licensed health care professional, a licensed 301 mental health professional, or an educational psychologist. Such 302 person may not be the childâs parent or relative or a person 303 employed by a child care provider. The following documentation 304 must be used to determine the childâs eligibility for such 305 accommodations: 306 a.âA current individual education plan with a Florida 307 school district; 308 b.âA current individualized family support plan; 309 c.âA diagnosed special need; or 310 d.âA written determination of required accommodations by a 311 licensed health care professional, a licensed mental health 312 professional, or an educational psychologist. 313 7.âA child who otherwise meets one of the eligibility 314 criteria in paragraphs (a) and (b) and subparagraphs 1. and 2. 315 but who is also enrolled concurrently in the federal Head Start 316 Program and the Voluntary Prekindergarten Education Program. 317 Section 16.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.